Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-557
Abstracts; effect of Title Standards.

In the compilation or examination of an abstract of title to real estate, it shall not be considered negligence for a registered abstracter or an attorney to follow the Title Standards promulgated by the Nebraska State Bar Association.

Laws 1973, LB 517, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 76-530;

Laws 1985, LB 47, § 27.

"Preparing written reports of title to real property" constitutes the "business of abstracting" for purposes of the Abstracters Act only when done in exchange for a fee or other valuable consideration. So construed, the Abstracters Act is not unconstitutionally overbroad on its face. State v. Rabourn, 269 Neb. 499, 693 N.W.2d 291 (2005).